incubator/apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="sen__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="omnskr/å__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åa</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærne</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ær</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åi</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sjekkont/o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iane</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oane</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oar</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oen</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="så__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sandørk/en__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enane</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enar</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enen</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nane</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nar</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rim__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mer</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="podi/um__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sagat/ått__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ættene</l>
          <r>ått<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ætter</l>
          <r>ått<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åttane</l>
          <r>ått<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åttar</l>
          <r>ått<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åtten</l>
          <r>ått<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ått</l>
          <r>ått<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="sjekkonto"><i>sjekkont</i><par n="sjekkont/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plakatkunst"><i>plakatkunst</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scenekunst"><i>scenekunst</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pest"><i>pest</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opptakt"><i>opptakt</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ovarium"><i>ovari</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opkunst"><i>opkunst</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjølvstudium"><i>sjølvstudi</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="proprium"><i>propri</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skrivekunst"><i>skrivekunst</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skammekrå"><i>skammekr</i><par n="omnskr/å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjølvtillit"><i>sjølvtillit</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nygrad"><i>nygrad</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="presbyterium"><i>presbyteri</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="omsettingssvikt"><i>omsettingssvikt</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sanatorium"><i>sanatori</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="observatorium"><i>observatori</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skulelov"><i>skulelov</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rørslelov"><i>rørslelov</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="remedium"><i>remedi</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sinkemaskin"><i>sinkemaskin</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slipemaskin"><i>slipemaskin</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjekk-konto"><i>sjekk-kont</i><par n="sjekkont/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rekambiokonto"><i>rekambiokont</i><par n="sjekkont/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podium"><i>podi</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perigeum"><i>perige</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="særlov"><i>særlov</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjøterritorium"><i>sjøterritori</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="officium"><i>offici</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skodespelarkunst"><i>skodespelarkunst</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="renessansekunst"><i>renessansekunst</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="postgirokonto"><i>postgirokont</i><par n="sjekkont/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="purgatorium"><i>purgatori</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sagatått"><i>sagat</i><par n="sagat/ått__n"/></e>
    <e lm="postludium"><i>postludi</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sandørken"><i>sandørk</i><par n="sandørk/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="planetarium"><i>planetari</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="omnskrå"><i>omnskr</i><par n="omnskr/å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="raft"><i>raft</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scenarium"><i>scenari</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oppvaskmaskin"><i>oppvaskmaskin</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="offertorium"><i>offertori</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samlivskunst"><i>samlivskunst</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puppestadium"><i>puppestadi</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prepareringsmaskin"><i>prepareringsmaskin</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skriveblokk"><i>skriveblokk</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="såmaskin"><i>såmaskin</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sekt"><i>sekt</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samansurium"><i>samansuri</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ros"><i>ros</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pallium"><i>palli</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oratorium"><i>oratori</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samtidskunst"><i>samtidskunst</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="privilegium"><i>privilegi</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sen"><i>sen</i><par n="sen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pandemonium"><i>pandemoni</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sekstiårsjubileum"><i>sekstiårsjubile</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="refektorium"><i>refektori</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="preludium"><i>preludi</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="popkunst"><i>popkunst</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rim"><i>rim</i><par n="rim__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pyramideblokk"><i>pyramideblokk</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="omsetnadssvikt"><i>omsetnadssvikt</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="platanløn"><i>platanløn</i><par n="så__n"/></e>
    <e lm="provisorium"><i>provisori</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perihelium"><i>periheli</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="presidium"><i>presidi</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
